New Jersey, session 221, S2714.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Each report of a patients chest x-ray provided to the patient shall, if the patient's chest x-ray demonstrates any abnormality, include the following information, at a minimum: Your chest x-ray shows an abnormality that may be associated with a risk factor for various illnesses.  This information about the result of your chest x-ray is given to you to raise your awareness.  Use this information to talk to your health care provider about any risks for illness that pertain to your personal medical history. At that time, ask your health care provider if more screening tests might be useful, based on your risk.  A report of your results was sent to your physician. 2.    The Commissioner of Health, pursuant to the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to effectuate the purposes of section 1 of P.L.    , c.    (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the fourth month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Health may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.